csv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_d.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagadinig
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagak
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagasininig
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagasinog
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagadinigiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagakiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagasininigiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagasinoogiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagadinigwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagadogwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagasininiigwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagasinoogwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagadinigobanen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagadogobanen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagasininigobanen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagasinoogobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagadinig
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagak
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagasininig
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagasinog
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagadinigiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagakiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagasininigiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagasinoogiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagadinigwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagadogwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagasininiigwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagasinoogwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagadinigobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagadogobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagasininigobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagasinoogobanen
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv+NA: atemagadiniwan
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx+NA: atemagadoon
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv+NA: atemagadini
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx+NA: atemagad
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv+NA: atemagasininiwan
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx+NA: atemagasinoon
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv+NA: atemagasinini
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx+NA: atemagasinoon
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [atemagadiniibaniin,atemagadiniibanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [atemagadoobaniin,atemagadoobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv+NA: atemagadiniiban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx+NA: atemagadooban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [atemagasininiibaniin,atemagasininiibanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [atemagasinoobaniin,atemagasinoobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv+NA: atemagasininiiban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx+NA: atemagasinooban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv+NA: atemagadiniwidogen
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx+NA: atemagadodogen
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv+NA: atemagadiniwidog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx+NA: atemagadodog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv+NA: atemagasininiwidogen
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx+NA: atemagasinodogen
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv+NA: atemagasininiwidog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx+NA: atemagasinodog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [atemagadinigobaniin,atemagadinigobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [atemagadogobaniin,atemagadogobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: atemagadinigoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: atemagadogoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [atemagasininigobaniin,atemagasininigobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [atemagasinoogobaniin,atemagasinoogobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: atemagasininigoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: atemagasinoogoban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv+NA: zanagadiniwan
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx+NA: zanagadoon
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv+NA: zanagadini
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx+NA: zanagad
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv+NA: zanagasininiwan
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx+NA: zanagasinoon
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv+NA: zanagasinini
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx+NA: zanagasinoon
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [zanagadiniibaniin,zanagadiniibanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [zanagadoobaniin,zanagadoobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv+NA: zanagadiniiban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx+NA: zanagadooban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [zanagasininiibaniin,zanagasininiibanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [zanagasinoobaniin,zanagasinoobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv+NA: zanagasininiiban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx+NA: zanagasinooban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv+NA: [zanagadiniwidogenan,zanagadiniwidogen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx+NA: [zanagadodogenan,zanagadodogen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv+NA: zanagadiniwidog
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx+NA: zanagadodog
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv+NA: [zanagasininiwidogenan,zanagasininiwidogen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx+NA: [zanagasinodogenan,zanagasinodogen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv+NA: zanagasininiwidog
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx+NA: zanagasinodog
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [zanagadinigobaniin,zanagadinigobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [zanagadogobaniin,zanagadogobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: zanagadinigoban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: zanagadogoban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [zanagasininigobaniin,zanagasininigobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [zanagasinoogobaniin,zanagasinoogobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: zanagasininigoban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: zanagasinoogoban
